Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202535-1204
Mutual finance organization; creation by agreement; tax levy.

(1) A mutual finance organization may be created by agreement among its members pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency Act. The agreement shall:

(a) Have a duration of three years;

(b) Require that each member of the mutual finance organization levy the same agreed-upon property tax rate within their boundaries for one out of the three tax years covered by the agreement. The members need not levy such agreed-upon property tax rate during the same year;

(c) Require that all members of the mutual finance organization levy no more than such agreed-upon property tax rate for the remaining tax years covered by the agreement; and

(d) Contain a statement of the agreed-upon maximum property tax rate.

(2) The property tax rates described in subsection (1) of this section shall be levied for the purpose of jointly funding the operations of all members of the mutual finance organization. All such property tax rates shall exclude levies for bonded indebtedness and lease-purchase contracts in existence on or after July 1, 1998.

Laws 1998, LB 1120, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 70;

Laws 2019, LB63, § 3;

Laws 2020, LB1130, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB399, § 1.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.